Utah statutes.
73-22-2.   Legislative findings.

It is declared to be in the public interest to foster, encourage, and promote the discovery, development, production, utilization, and disposal of geothermal resources in the State of Utah in such manner as will prevent waste, protect correlative rights, and safeguard the natural environment and the public welfare; to authorize, encourage, and provide for the development and operation of geothermal resource properties in such manner that the maximum ultimate economic recovery of geothermal resources may be obtained through, among other things, agreements for cooperative development, production, injection, and pressure maintenance operations.



Enacted by Chapter 188, 1981 General Session

